Vermont, session 2025-2026, H644.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Individuals are increasingly using chatbots to receive unlicensed
therapy from large language models (LLMs), and researchers from the
Stanford Institute for Human-Centered Artificial Intelligence, Carnegie Mellon
University, the University of Minnesota Twin Cities, and the University of
Texas evaluated artificial intelligence systems against clinical standards for
therapists, finding that commercially available therapy chatbots responded
inappropriately to various mental health conditions, encouraged delusions, and
failed to recognize crises, contrary to clinical best practice.
(2) Researchers at the Center for Countering Digital Hate found patterns
of ChatGPT advice pertaining to mental health, eating disorders, and substance
use disorders on topics such as “how to ‘safely’ cut yourself,” “pills for
overdose,” “restrictive diet plans,” “appetite-suppressing medications,”
“personalized plans for getting drunk,” and “how to hide intoxication at
school”; the chatbot also generated a suicide plan and goodbye notes to family.
(3) Deaths by suicide have been reported after the deceased’s use of an
artificial intelligence tool, including an individual 14 years of age who died by
suicide after suicidal conversations with a chatbot and an individual 13 years
of age who was encouraged to take his own life by a chatbot.
VT LEG #385017 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.644
2026 Page 3 of 9
Sec. 2. PURPOSE
It is the purpose of this act to safeguard individuals seeking mental health
services in Vermont from psychological harm, including death by suicide, by
ensuring that these services are delivered by mental health professionals and
not artificial intelligence systems.
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 129a is amended to read:
§ 129a. UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT
(a) In addition to any other provision of law, the following conduct by a
licensee constitutes unprofessional conduct. When that conduct is by an
applicant or person who later becomes an applicant, it may constitute grounds
for denial of a license or other disciplinary action. Any one of the following
items or any combination of items, whether the conduct at issue was
committed within or outside the State, shall constitute unprofessional conduct:
* * *
(30) For any mental health professional, misuse of artificial intelligence
pursuant to 26 V.S.A. § 7101.
* * *
Sec. 4. 18 V.S.A. § 7115 is added to read:
§ 7115. PROHIBITED USES OF ARTIFICAL INTELLIGENCE
(a) As used in this section:
VT LEG #385017 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.644
2026 Page 4 of 9
(1) “Artificial intelligence” means any machine-based system, software,
or algorithm that, depending on human objectives, is capable of perceiving an
environment through data acquisition and then processing and interpreting the
derived information to take an action or to imitate intelligent behavior, such as
natural language processing, pattern recognition, predictive analytics, offering
recommendations, or decision making.
(2) “Mental health services” means peer support, counseling, therapy, or
psychotherapy services used to diagnose or treat an individual’s mental or
behavioral health or provide ongoing recovery support, including providing
therapeutic decisions, issuing direct therapeutic communications, generating
treatment plans or recommendations, or detecting or interpreting emotions or
mental states.
(3) “Therapeutic communication” has the same meaning as in 26 V.S.A.
§ 7101.
(b) A person, corporation, or entity shall not offer, provide, or advertise
mental health services in the State that use artificial intelligence in whole or in
part, except as authorized pursuant to 26 V.S.A. § 7101.
(c)(1) A violation of this section shall be deemed a violation of the
Consumer Protection Act, 9 V.S.A. chapter 63. The Attorney General has the
same authority to make rules, conduct civil investigations, enter into
assurances of discontinuance, and bring civil actions, and private parties have
VT LEG #385017 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.644
2026 Page 5 of 9
the same rights and remedies, as provided under 9 V.S.A. chapter 63,
subchapter 1. Each violation of this section shall carry a civil penalty of
$10,000.00 as set forth in 9 V.S.A. § 2461.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude or supplant any
other statutory or common law remedies.
Sec. 5. 26 V.S.A. chapter 120 is added to read:
CHAPTER 120. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN REGULATED
PROFESSIONS
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 7001. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter, “artificial intelligence” means any machine-based
system, software, or algorithm that, depending on human objectives, is capable
of perceiving an environment through data acquisition and then processing and
interpreting the derived information to take an action or to imitate intelligent
behavior, such as natural language processing, pattern recognition, predictive
analytics, offering recommendations, or decision making.
Subchapter 2. Use of Artificial Intelligence by Mental Health
Professionals
§ 7101. PROHIBITED USES OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE IN
THERAPEUTIC SETTINGS
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
VT LEG #385017 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.644
2026 Page 6 of 9
(1) “Administrative support” means a task, other than therapeutic
communication, that is performed to assist a mental health professional in the
professional’s delivery of mental health services, such as:
(A) managing appointment scheduling and reminders;
(B) processing billing and insurance claims;
(C) drafting general communications related to practice logistics;
(D) preparing and maintaining clinical records, including notes from
patient or client sessions;
(E) analyzing deidentified data to track patient or client progress or
identify trends; and
(F) identifying and organizing external resources or referrals for
patient or client use.
(2) “Consent” means an explicit, affirmative act by an individual that
unambiguously communicates in writing voluntary, informed, and revocable
agreement.
(3) “Mental health professional” means an individual licensed, certified,
or rostered, respectively, to provide mental health services as a physician
pursuant to chapter 23 or 33 of this title; an advance practice registered nurse
specializing in psychiatric mental health pursuant to chapter 28 of this title; a
psychologist pursuant to chapter 55 of this title; a peer support provider or peer
recovery support specialist pursuant to chapter 60 of this title; a social worker
VT LEG #385017 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.644
2026 Page 7 of 9
pursuant to chapter 61 of this title; an alcohol and drug abuse counselor
pursuant to chapter 62 of this title; a clinical mental health counselor pursuant
to chapter 65 of this title; a marriage and family therapist pursuant to chapter
76 of this title; a psychoanalyst pursuant to chapter 77 of this title; or an
applied behavior analyst pursuant to chapter 95 of this title; and a nonlicensed
or noncertified psychotherapist, noncertified psychoanalyst, or any other
professional that provides mental health services.
(4) “Mental health services” means peer support, counseling, therapy, or
psychotherapy services provided by a mental health professional to diagnose or
treat an individual’s mental or behavioral health or provide ongoing recovery
support.
(5) “Therapeutic communication” means a written, verbal, or nonverbal
interaction conducted in a professional therapeutic setting intended to diagnose
or treat any type of mental or behavioral health concern, provide ongoing
recovery support, or provide any advice related to diagnosis, treatment, or
recovery, such as:
(A) engaging in direct interactions with clients or patients for the
purpose of understanding or reflecting their thoughts, emotions, or
experiences;
(B) providing guidance, therapeutic strategies, or interventions
designed to achieve mental health outcomes;
VT LEG #385017 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.644
2026 Page 8 of 9
(C) offering emotional support, reassurance, or empathy in response
to emotional or psychological distress;
(D) collaborating with a patient or client to develop or modify
treatment plans or therapeutic goals; and
(E) delivering feedback intended to promote growth or address
mental health conditions.
(b) Permitted uses.
(1) A mental health professional may use artificial intelligence for
administrative support to the extent that the professional reviews and assumes
responsibility for all tasks performed by, outputs created by, and data use
associated with the artificial intelligence system employed.
(2) If a mental health professional uses artificial intelligence for
transcription and recording purposes, the mental health professional shall first:
(A) inform the patient or client, or the patient’s or client’s legal
guardian, in writing of the specific purpose for which artificial intelligence is
being used and that any transcription or recording performed by artificial
intelligence shall be subject to the disclosure prohibitions in subsection (c) of
this section; and
(B) obtain consent from the patient or client, or the patient’s or
client’s legal guardian.
VT LEG #385017 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.644
2026 Page 9 of 9
(c) Confidentiality. Any administrative support tasks conducted using
artificial intelligence shall be subject to the disclosure prohibitions in 18
V.S.A. §§ 1881 and 7103, including transcription and recording.
(d) Prohibited uses. A mental health professional shall neither:
(1) use artificial intelligence in the State to make therapeutic decisions,
issue direct therapeutic communications, generate treatment plans or
recommendations, or detect or interpret emotions or mental states; nor
(2) offer, provide, or advertise mental health services in the State that
use artificial intelligence in whole or in part, except as provided in subsection
(b) of this section.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385017 v.3